Maryland, session 2025, SB0028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
15–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Coerce” means to compel or attempt to compel by threat of harm,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0028*

SENATE BILL 28
breach of contract, or other adverse action or consequences, including the loss of any
incentive or other benefit made available to other dealers of the same line make in the
State.
(ii) “Coerce” includes to act in a manner that violates § 15–206.1 of
this subtitle.
(iii) “Coerce” does not include to argue, urge, recommend, or
persuade.
(3) “PURCHASE PRICE” MEANS THE FULL DELIVERED PRICE OF A
VEHICLE, EXCLUDING ONLY TAXES, TITLE FEES, AND ANY FREIGHT OR DEALER
PROCESSING CHARGE DISCLOSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–311.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(4) “Require” means to impose upon a dealer a provision not required by
law or previously agreed to by a dealer in a franchise agreement, excluding business
decisions made to comply with the requirements of this title by a manufacturer, distributor,
or factory branch which are uniformly applied to all Maryland dealers in new vehicles of
the manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch.
(h) (1) (i) Any consumer rebates, dealer incentives, price or interest rate
reductions, or finance terms that a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch offers or
advertises, or allows its dealers to offer or advertise, shall be offered to all dealers of the
same line make.
(ii) Any manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch that denies the
benefit of any consumer rebates, dealer incentives, price or interest rate reductions, or
finance terms to a dealer on the basis that the dealer failed to comply with performance
standards has the burden of proving that the performance standards comply with the
provisions of this section.
(2) Unless a dealer violates a State or local law intended to protect the
public, a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch may not:
(i) Require a dealer to alter or replace an existing dealership
facility; or
(ii) Deny, or threaten to deny, any benefit generally available to all
dealers for a dealer’s failure to alter or replace an existing dealership facility.
(3) UNLESS A DEALER VIOLATES § 15–313(A) OR (B) OF THIS TITLE
OR A STATE OR LOCAL LAW INTENDED TO PROTECT THE PUBLIC, A MANUFACTURER,
DISTRIBUTOR, OR FACTORY BRANCH MAY NOT:
(I) PROHIBIT A DEALER FROM LISTING A VEHICLE FOR SALE
OR LEASE ON THE DEALER’S WEBSITE AT THE PURCHASE PRICE;

SENATE BILL 28 3
(II) COERCE OR REQUIRE A DEALER TO LIST A PRICE ON THE
DEALER’S WEBSITE THAT IS DIFFERENT FROM THE PURCHASE PRICE OF A VEHICLE;
OR
(III) TAKE AN ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A DEALER FOR LISTING
A VEHICLE FOR SALE AT A PARTICULAR PRICE ON THE DEALER’S WEBSITE.
[(3)] (4) A manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch may not reduce
the price of a motor vehicle charged to a dealer or provide different financing terms to a
dealer in exchange for the dealer’s agreement to:
(i) Maintain an exclusive sales or service facility;
(ii) Build or alter a sales or service facility; or
(iii) Participate in a floor plan or other financing arrangement.
(5) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION PROHIBITS A MANUFACTURER,
DISTRIBUTOR, OR FACTORY BRANCH FROM REQUIRING ALL DEALERS TO INCLUDE
FREIGHT OR DEALER PROCESSING CHARGES IN THE PRICES LISTED ON A DEALER’S
WEBSITE.
15–313.
(a) A dealer or an agent or employee of a dealer may not use any advertisement
that is in any way false, deceptive, or misleading.
(b) A dealer or an agent or employee of a dealer may not by any means advertise
or offer to the public any vehicle without intent to sell it as advertised or offered.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.